Colorado statutes. TITLE 26 Human Services Code
ARTICLE 7.8
HOMELESS PREVENTION
ACTIVITIES PROGRAM

Law reviews:

For note, "Hunger and Homelessness in America: A survey of State Legislation", see 66 Den. U. L. Rev. 277 (1989).

Section

26-7.8-101. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds that there are a growing number of persons in this state who lack the resources and the community ties necessary to provide for their own adequate shelter and who are likely to become homeless without community assistance. The general assembly recognizes that women and children are the fastest growing group of the homeless and that a large percentage of the total homeless population consists of families. The general assembly therefore finds that it is beneficial to the state to fund prevention activities programs to assist families and other persons who are likely to become homeless without some community assistance; that this article is enacted to provide a means by which such programs may be financed through a voluntary contribution designation on state income tax return forms; and that it is desirable to encourage residents of this state to designate the amount of such contribution to help fund such prevention activities programs on their state income tax return forms.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article added, p. 1226, § 1, effective July 1.

26-7.8-102. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Division" means the division of housing within the department of local affairs created in section 24-32-704, C.R.S.

(1.5) "Executive director" means the executive director of the department of local affairs.

"Homeless prevention activities program" means a community-based or community-oriented program which is operated by the division and established pursuant to the criteria set forth in section 26-7.8-103 to assist in preventing families and other persons from becoming homeless.

Repealed.

"Unit of local government" means a county, city and county, city, town, or municipality.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article added, p. 1226, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1945, § 1, effective April 17.

L. 93:

(1) amended, p. 1157, § 116, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 2012:

(1) and (2) amended, (1.5) added, and (3) repealed, (SB 12-158), ch. 151, p. 543, § 4, effective May 3.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1993 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 230, Session Laws of Colorado 1993.

26-7.8-103. Homeless prevention activities program - criteria.

A homeless prevention activities program established pursuant to this article shall provide, but need not be limited to:

Assistance in avoiding eviction and foreclosure from an apartment or home;

Counseling for families and persons to prevent them from becoming homeless;

Mediation services to assist persons in avoiding eviction and foreclosure;

Programs that assist persons who are in danger of becoming homeless in obtaining services and information;

Referrals to and assistance in obtaining job-training, job-counseling, or information about job openings.

(1.5) The program established by this article shall be administered by the division with recommendations from an advisory committee which is hereby created. The advisory committee shall be composed of at least three members selected by the executive director. One member shall be a representative of the department of human services, and two members shall be representatives from the public at large. The committee shall serve without compensation and shall not be entitled to reimbursement for their expenses while attending meetings of the committee. The division shall administer the program under the direction of the advisory committee.

At least seventy-five percent of all voluntary contributions made to the homeless prevention activities program fund pursuant to section 39-22-1301, C.R.S., shall be used for direct or financial benefit to individuals in Colorado who are homeless or in danger of becoming homeless; except that no funds shall be expended for direct cash payment to homeless persons or persons who are in danger of becoming homeless.

(2.5) The division is authorized to spend up to five percent of all voluntary contributions made to the homeless prevention activities program fund, created pursuant to the provisions of section 39-22-1301, C.R.S., or fifteen thousand dollars, whichever is greater, for costs incurred in administering the program established by this article.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article added, p. 1227, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(1.5) added and (2) and (3) amended, p. 1945, § 2, effective April 17.

L. 92:

(1.5) and (3) amended and (2.5) added, p. 2144, § 1, effective March 25.

L. 94:

(1.5) amended, p. 2706, § 273, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(3) repealed, p. 1252, § 133, effective August 7.

L. 2012:

(1.5) and (2.5) amended, (SB 12-158), ch. 151, p. 544, § 5, effective May 3.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1994 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 345, Session Laws of Colorado 1994; for the legislative declaration contained in the 1996 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 237, Session Laws of Colorado 1996.

26-7.8-104. Homeless prevention activities program - contracts with nongovernmental agency - program standards.

The division shall enter into contracts or agreements for services for homeless prevention activities; except that the division shall not spend more than five percent of all voluntary contributions received on administrative costs.

Repealed.

The advisory committee shall direct the division to establish and enforce standards for all homeless prevention activities programs established pursuant to this article.

The advisory committee shall establish standards governing this program which assure that the funds collected pursuant to section 39-22-1301, C.R.S., are allocated to nongovernmental agencies, either directly or through the coordination and oversight of units of local government, for use for direct client services and assistance.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article added, p. 1227, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1946, § 3, effective April 17.

L. 92:

(1) to (3) amended, p. 2145, § 2, effective March 25.

L. 2011:

(5) added, (HB 11-1230), ch. 170, p. 588, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2012:

(1) and (3) amended and (2) and (5) repealed, (SB 12-158), ch. 151, p. 544, § 6, effective May 3.

26-7.8-105. Funding of homeless prevention activities programs. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article added, p. 1228, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 91:

Entire section repealed, p. 1948, § 8, effective April 17.

26-7.8-106. Repeal of article. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 89:

Entire article added, p. 1228, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1947, § 4, effective April 17.

L. 95:

Entire section repealed, p. 116, § 5, effective March 31.